Hawaii statutes.
§353-13.7 Initiation of proceeding for
involuntary medical treatment. (a) The director, or the director's designee, may file a
petition for involuntary medical treatment alleging that a person in the
custody of the department meets the criteria
for involuntary medical treatment under section 353-13.6. The petition shall
be executed subject to the penalties of perjury but need not be sworn to before
a notary public and shall be filed in the circuit court of the circuit wherein
the person who is the subject of the
petition is in custody. The attorney general, the attorney general's deputy,
special deputy, or appointee designated to present the case shall assist the
petitioner to state the substance of the petition in plain and simple language. The petition may be
accompanied by an affidavit or declaration of the licensed physician or psychologist who has examined
the person within five days prior to submission of the petition, unless the
person whose treatment is sought has refused to submit to a medical or
psychological examination, in which case the fact of refusal shall be alleged
in the petition. The affidavit or declaration
shall set forth the signs and symptoms relied upon by the physician or
psychologist to determine whether the person is in need of treatment, whether
the person is capable of realizing and making a rational decision with respect
to the person's need for treatment, and the recommended treatment. If the
petitioner believes that further evaluation is necessary before treatment, the
petitioner may request such further evaluation.

(b) If
the person has been given an examination, evaluation, or treatment in a
psychiatric facility or by the department within five days before the filing of
the petition, and treatment is recommended by the staff of the facility or the
department, the petition may be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration of the department's
medical director or the mental health administrator in lieu of a physician's or
psychologist's affidavit or declaration. [L 2011, c 72, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 35, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next